District of Columbia statutes.
1-1212

Copy of record as evidence.

The certificate of a notary public, under his hand and seal of office, drawn from his record, stating the protest and the facts therein recorded, shall be evidence of the facts in like manner as the original protest.

History

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1280, ch. 854, § 570

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-812.
1973 Ed., § 1-513.